apertium-tg-fa.tg.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЧШЪЭЮЯҒӢҚӮҲҶабвгдеёжзийклмнопрстуфхчшъэюяғӣқӯҳҷцыь</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="enc"     c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="clt"     c="Clitic"/>

    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine-Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / Plural"/>

    <sdef n="prs"     c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="pic"     c="Past conjectural"/>
    <sdef n="ftc"     c="Future/present conjectural"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="inf2"    c="Infinitive (II)"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Past participle I"/>
    <sdef n="ppgi"    c="Past participle II"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"    c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="perf"    c="Perfect"/>
    <sdef n="dur"     c="Durative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="px1sg"   c="Possessive, First person singular"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg"   c="Possessive, Second person singular"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg"   c="Possessive, Third person singular"/>
    <sdef n="px1pl"   c="Possessive, First person plural"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl"   c="Possessive, Second person plural"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl"   c="Possessive, Third person plural"/>

    <sdef n="pst"     c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="qnt"     c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>

    <sdef n="acr"     c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="al"      c="Other / Otros"/>
    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>

    <sdef n="nn"      c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="an"      c="Animate / inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Animate"/>

    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="emph"    c="Emphatic"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="izo"     c="Izofa"/>

    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"  c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>       <p><l>-</l><r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>       <p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>       <p><l>'</l><r>'<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Enclitics -->

    <pardef n="S__ва_C">
      <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><j/>ва<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ва_V">
      <e>       <p><l>ву</l><r><j/>ва<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__будан"> <!-- Clitic present of 'to be' -->
      <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
<!--      <e>       <p><l>ӣ</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва"/></e>--> <!-- Really ambiguous nouns vs. adjec -->
      <e>       <p><l>аст</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ем</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ед</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>анд</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__accusative">
      <e>       <p><l>ро</l><r><j/>ро<s n="enc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__possess">
      <e>       <p><l>м</l><r><j/>ам<s n="enc"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>т</l><r><j/>ат<s n="enc"/><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ш</l><r><j/>аш<s n="enc"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мон</l><r><j/>амон<s n="enc"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>тон</l><r><j/>атон<s n="enc"/><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>шон</l><r><j/>ашон<s n="enc"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>м</l><r><j/>ам<s n="enc"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>т</l><r><j/>ат<s n="enc"/><s n="px2sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ш</l><r><j/>аш<s n="enc"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мон</l><r><j/>амон<s n="enc"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>тон</l><r><j/>атон<s n="enc"/><s n="px2pl"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>шон</l><r><j/>ашон<s n="enc"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__possess_C">
      <e>       <p><l>а</l><r></r></p><par n="S__possess"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__possess_V">
      <e>       <p><l>я</l><r></r></p><par n="S__possess"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__iza_C">
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><j/>и<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r></p></e> <!-- end of the line -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__iza_V">
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><j/>и<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ind_C">
      <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><j/>е<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><j/>е<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ind_V">
      <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><j/>е<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><j/>е<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__nominal_C_verb">
      <!-- Clitics that can be added to nominals 
           Morphotactics: stem + (number)? + (definite)? + (object)?
        -->
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__ind_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__iza_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p><par n="S__possess_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="S__accusative"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><j/>ва<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>анда</l><r><j/>анда<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="coma"/></e>
      <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
      <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
      <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
